src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V2V-DERIVATION-INITIAL-VOW

@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@%>%{ЕОØ%}в VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>%{ЕОØ%}в INF_OM ;! was Non-Finite-Vws 
@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>%{ЕОØ%}в Non-Finite-Cns ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@+Der+Der/OvOms+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@%>%{ЕОØ%}вкшне VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Der+Der/OvOms+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>%{ЕОØ%}вкшне INF_OM ;! was Non-Finite-Vws 
@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Der+Der/OvOms+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.DERIV.2V@@C.CONJ@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>%{ЕОØ%}вкшне Non-Finite-Cns ;

@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@P.DERIV.2V@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@P.DERIV.2V@%>%{ЕОØ%}кшне VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
@P.DERIV.2V@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.DERIV.2V@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>%{ЕОØ%}кшне INF_OM ;! was Non-Finite-Vws 
@P.DERIV.2V@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.DERIV.2V@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>%{ЕОØ%}кшне Non-Finite-Cns ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@P.DERIV.2V@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+Der/OvOms+V:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@P.DERIV.2V@%>%{ЕОØ%}кшнев VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
@P.DERIV.2V@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+Der/OvOms+V:@P.DERIV.2V@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>%{ЕОØ%}кшнев INF_OM ;! was Non-Finite-Vws 
@P.DERIV.2V@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+Der/OvOms+V:@P.DERIV.2V@@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>%{ЕОØ%}кшнев Non-Finite-Cns ;
!Mormula 2020-08-31


!! ### AUXILIARY VERBS
LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1_ASHEZJ !!= @CODE@ ашезь:аш
 V-AUX-NEG-PRT1 ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+Neg:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3 ;
+Neg:%>езь  IND-PRT1-60_Т ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1:%>ень ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2:%>еть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3:%>езь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1:%>еме ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2:%>еде ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%>есть ENDLEX ;

LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1_IZJ !!= @CODE@ изь:изь
 V-AUX-NEG-PRT1 ;
+Neg: IND-PRT2-ALL ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+Neg:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3 ;
+Neg:  IND-PRT1-60_Т ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1:%>ень ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2:%>еть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1:%>еме ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2:%>еде ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^Devoice%^Ь2ZERO%>ть ENDLEX ;

LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2:%>ихтень ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3:%>ине ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3:%>ине ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3:%>ить ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3:%>ить ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3:%>езень ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3:%>езе ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3:%>еськ ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3:%>еськ ENDLEX ;

+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1:%>емайть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1:%>емасть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1:%>емасть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1:%>емасть ENDLEX ;

+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2:%>едезь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2:%>едезь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2:%>едезь ENDLEX ;

+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2:%>едезь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2:%>едезь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2:%>едезь ENDLEX ;

+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1:%>емань ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1:%>емазь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1:%>емазь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1:%>емазь ENDLEX ;

+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1:%>емезь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1:%>емезь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1:%>емезь ENDLEX ;


! Finite forms

!! FROM MYV

LEXICON VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ VERB-ZERO-ALL ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
	 IND-PRT1-ALL ; 
	 IND-PRT2-ALL ; 
@U.CONJ-MX.COND@+Cond:@U.CONJ-MX.COND@%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря VERB-ZERO-ALL ; !! COND-ALL
+Cond:%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ; !!= @CODE@ 
@U.CONJ-MX.NPROT@+NegCnd:@U.CONJ-MX.NPROT@%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря VERB-ZERO-ALL ; !! COND-ALL
+NegCnd:%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ; !!= @CODE@ 

	 CONJ-ALL     	;
	 DES-ALL     	;
	 IMPRT-ALL   	;
	 OPT-ALL       	;
!2026-02-16ME??!	 INF_OM		;
+ConNeg:%>%{АЕØ%} VerbEnd ;
+ConNeg:%>%{АЕØ%} PL-NOM-INDEF ;
+ConNeg+Use/NG:%^CnsSt%>%{АЕØ%} VerbEnd ;
+ConNeg+Use/NG:%^CnsSt%>%{АЕØ%} PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! ашень, тят, афоль
!! кирдемс+V+ConNeg **tolerate/kestää** ашень кирде
!!€ кирдь%>%{АЕØ%}
!!€ кирд0%>е
!!€ ван%>%{АЕØ%}
!!€ ван%>а
+ConNegII+Use/NG:%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%} K ;
+ConNegII+Use/NG:%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%} PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! апак Homonymy +Imprt+ScSg2
!! ваномс+V+ConNegII
!!€ ван%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ ват%>0т0
!!€ кирдь%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кирт0%>%{Х%}ть
!! ### INDICATIVE PRESENT and CONDITIONAL (non-past) POINTERS
LEXICON VERB-ZERO-ALL
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ VERB-ZERO-OC ;
 VERB-ZERO-SC ;

LEXICON VERB-ZERO-SC
 VERB-ZERO-SC-40/50 ;
  VERB-ZERO-SC-REMAINDER ;
LEXICON VERB-ZERO-SC-40/50
 VERB-ZERO-40 ;
 VERB-ZERO-50 ;
LEXICON VERB-ZERO-SC-REMAINDER
 VERB-ZERO-10 ;
 VERB-ZERO-20 ;
 VERB-ZERO-30 ;
 VERB-ZERO-60 ;


LEXICON VERB-ZERO-OC
 VERB-ZERO-OC2 ;
 VERB-ZERO-OC13 ;
LEXICON VERB-ZERO-OC2
 VERB-ZERO-12 ;
 VERB-ZERO-15 ;
 VERB-ZERO-32 ;
 VERB-ZERO-35 ;
 VERB-ZERO-42 ;
 VERB-ZERO-45 ;
 VERB-ZERO-62 ;
 VERB-ZERO-65 ;
LEXICON VERB-ZERO-OC13
 VERB-ZERO-13 ;
 VERB-ZERO-16 ;
 VERB-ZERO-21 ;
 VERB-ZERO-23 ;
 VERB-ZERO-24 ;
 VERB-ZERO-26 ;
 VERB-ZERO-31 ;
 VERB-ZERO-33 ;
 VERB-ZERO-34 ;
 VERB-ZERO-36 ;
 VERB-ZERO-43 ;
 VERB-ZERO-46 ;
 VERB-ZERO-51 ;
 VERB-ZERO-53 ;
 VERB-ZERO-54 ;
 VERB-ZERO-56 ;
 VERB-ZERO-61 ;
 VERB-ZERO-63 ;
 VERB-ZERO-64 ;
 VERB-ZERO-66 ;

!! ### INDICATIVE PRETERITE 1 POINTERS
LEXICON IND-PRT1-ALL
   IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3 ;
   IND-PRT1-SC3 ;

LEXICON IND-PRT1-SC3
 IND-PRT1-30 ;
 IND-PRT1-60 ;

LEXICON IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND-PRT1-OC ;
 IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3-ONLY-SC ;
LEXICON IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3-ONLY-SC
 IND-PRT1-10 ;
 IND-PRT1-20 ;
 IND-PRT1-40 ;
 IND-PRT1-50 ;


LEXICON IND-PRT1-OC
 IND-PRT1-OC-12/13/16/23/26 ;
  IND-PRT1-OC-REMAINDER ;
LEXICON IND-PRT1-OC-12/13/16/23/26
 IND-PRT1-12 ;
 IND-PRT1-13 ;
 IND-PRT1-16 ;
 IND-PRT1-23 ;
 IND-PRT1-26 ;
LEXICON IND-PRT1-OC-REMAINDER
 IND-PRT1-15 ;
 IND-PRT1-21 ;
 IND-PRT1-24 ;
 IND-PRT1-31 ;
 IND-PRT1-32 ;
 IND-PRT1-33 ;
 IND-PRT1-34 ;
 IND-PRT1-35 ;
 IND-PRT1-36 ;
 IND-PRT1-42 ;
 IND-PRT1-43 ;
 IND-PRT1-45 ;
 IND-PRT1-46 ;
 IND-PRT1-51 ;
 IND-PRT1-53 ;
 IND-PRT1-54 ;
 IND-PRT1-56 ;
 IND-PRT1-61 ;
 IND-PRT1-62 ;
 IND-PRT1-63 ;
 IND-PRT1-64 ;
 IND-PRT1-65 ;
 IND-PRT1-66 ;

!! ### INDICATIVE PRETERITE 2 POINTERS
LEXICON IND-PRT2-ALL
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND-PRT2-OC ;
 IND-PRT2-10 ;
 IND-PRT2-20 ;
 IND-PRT2-30 ;
 IND-PRT2-40 ;
 IND-PRT2-50 ;
 IND-PRT2-60 ;


LEXICON IND-PRT2-OC
 IND-PRT2-12 ;
 IND-PRT2-13 ;
 IND-PRT2-15 ;
 IND-PRT2-16 ;
 IND-PRT2-21 ;
 IND-PRT2-23 ;
 IND-PRT2-24 ;
 IND-PRT2-26 ;
 IND-PRT2-31 ;
 IND-PRT2-32 ;
 IND-PRT2-33 ;
 IND-PRT2-34 ;
 IND-PRT2-35 ;
 IND-PRT2-36 ;
 IND-PRT2-42 ;
 IND-PRT2-43 ;
 IND-PRT2-45 ;
 IND-PRT2-46 ;
 IND-PRT2-51 ;
 IND-PRT2-53 ;
 IND-PRT2-54 ;
 IND-PRT2-56 ;
 IND-PRT2-61 ;
 IND-PRT2-62 ;
 IND-PRT2-63 ;
 IND-PRT2-64 ;
 IND-PRT2-65 ;
 IND-PRT2-66 ;

!! ### CONJUNCTIVE

LEXICON CONJ-ALL
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ CONJ-OC ;
 CNJ-10 ;
 CNJ-20 ;
 CNJ-30 ;
 CNJ-40 ;
 CNJ-50 ;
 CNJ-60 ;


LEXICON CONJ-OC
 CNJ-12 ;
 CNJ-13 ;
 CNJ-15 ;
 CNJ-16 ;
 CNJ-21 ;
 CNJ-23 ;
 CNJ-24 ;
 CNJ-26 ;
 CNJ-31 ;
 CNJ-32 ;
 CNJ-33 ;
 CNJ-34 ;
 CNJ-35 ;
 CNJ-36 ;
 CNJ-42 ;
 CNJ-43 ;
 CNJ-45 ;
 CNJ-46 ;
 CNJ-51 ;
 CNJ-53 ;
 CNJ-54 ;
 CNJ-56 ;
 CNJ-61 ;
 CNJ-62 ;
 CNJ-63 ;
 CNJ-64 ;
 CNJ-65 ;
 CNJ-66 ;

!! ### CONDITIONAL and subsequent CONJUNCTIVE

LEXICON COND-4CONJ-ALL
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ COND-4CONJ-OC ;
 COND-4CONJ-10 ;
 COND-4CONJ-20 ;
 COND-4CONJ-30 ;
 COND-4CONJ-40 ;
 COND-4CONJ-50 ;
 COND-4CONJ-60 ;

LEXICON VERBNEGATIVE
аш+V+Aux+Neg+Loc:аш IND-PRT2-ALL ;
аф+V+Aux:аш V-AUX-NEG-PRT1_ASHEZJ ; !These are both the same ашезь and изь, supletive
аф+Use/NG+V+Aux:изь  V-AUX-NEG-PRT1_IZJ ;
